Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-275.01
Conveyance by married persons to themselves prior to August 24, 1941, as joint tenants; validity.

Unless action is brought before September 7, 1948, to set aside the deed upon that ground, all deeds of conveyance executed by any person to himself or herself and the spouse of such person or by married persons direct to themselves as joint tenants with right of survivorship, which deeds were executed and recorded prior to August 24, 1941, be and the same hereby are legalized and validated as though a married person had the power, prior to August 24, 1941, to convey property directly to his or her spouse in the same manner and to the same extent as if he or she were unmarried.

Laws 1947, c. 248, § 1, p. 772.

For authority of married persons to convey to themselves as joint tenants subsequent to August 24, 1941, see section 76-118.